West Virginia, session 2026, HB5544.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. PERSONAL INCOME TAX. §11-21-12o. Deduction for contributions to Trump Accounts. (a) Deduction. – In computing West Virginia adjusted gross income, a resident taxpayer may deduct contributions made during the taxable year to a Trump Account established for a qualifying dependent child.(b) Definition. – For purposes of this section, a "Trump Account" shall have the meaning prescribed to it in 26 U.S. Code § 6434 entitled "Trump accounts contribution pilot program," as well as how the account is established under Section 530A of the Internal Revenue Code.(c) Qualifiers. – The term “eligible child” means a qualifying child, as defined in section 152 of 26 U.S. Code § 6434, who:(1) Is born after December 31, 2024, and before January 1, 2029,(2) With respect to whom no prior election has been made under this section by such individual or any other individual, and(3) Who is a United States citizen.(d) Maximum allowed. – The maximum deduction allowed under this section is:(1) $1,000 for an individual taxpayer; or(2) $2,000 for married individuals filing a joint return.(e) No other deductions. – Contributions deducted under this section may not be deducted under any other provision of this chapter.(f) Exemption. – Earnings accruing within a Trump Account are exempt from West Virginia personal income tax until distributed.(g) Rules. – The Tax Commissioner may promulgate rules to administer this section.